Maryland, session 2025, HB0665.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(M) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026, THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–861 OF THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME
MANNER THEY APPLY TO CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxiii) Beginning on July 1, 2025, shall provide, subject to the
limitations of the State budget, and as permitted by federal law, coverage for biomarker
testing in accordance with § 15–859 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxiv) Beginning on January 1, 2025, shall provide coverage for
prostheses in accordance with § 15–844 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXV) BEGINNING ON JULY 1, 2026, SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE
FOR ANNUAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WELLNESS VISITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
15–861 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–861.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WELLNESS VISIT” MEANS A CLINICAL
ENCOUNTER DURING WHICH A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER CONDUCTS AN
ASSESSMENT TO IDENTIFY WHETHER A PATIENT MEETS CRITERIA FOR A
PSYCHIATRIC OR SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER.

HOUSE BILL 665 3
(3) “HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL:
(I) WHO IS LICENSED, CERTIFIED, OR OTHERWISE AUTHORIZED
UNDER THE HEALTH OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE TO PRACTICE A HEALTH OCCUPATION;
AND
(II) WHOSE SCOPE OF PRACTICE INCLUDES THE PROVISION OF
MENTAL HEALTH AND SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER CARE SERVICES.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) (1) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR AN ANNUAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WELLNESS VISIT, REGARDLESS
OF THE ASSESSMENT RESULTING IN A BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DIAGNOSIS.
(2) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE
REIMBURSEMENT FOR AN ANNUAL BEHAVIORAL HEALTH WELLNESS VISIT ON THE
SAME BASIS AND AT THE SAME RATE AS AN ASSESSMENT THAT RESULTS IN A
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DIAGNOSIS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2026.